Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
General Provisions

381.9101.
Short title for KRS 381.9101 to 381.9207.

KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

shall be known and may be cited as the Kentucky Condominium Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 1, effective January 1, 2011.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Brinkman, The Kentucky Condominium Act,
Vol. 74, No. 5, September 2010, Ky. Bench & Bar 16.

381.9103.
Application and construction of KRS 381.9101 to 381.9207.

Except as provided in subsections (2), (3 ), and (4) of this section, KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

applies to all condominiums created within the Commonwealth after January 1, 2011.

KRS

381.9109

,

381.9111

,

381.9113

,

381.9129

,

381.9131

,

381.9167

,

381.9169

,

381.9183

,

381.9193

,

381.9197

, 381.9201(2), and

381.9203

, and KRS

381.9105

to the extent necessary in construing any of these sections, apply to all condominiums created before January 1, 2011, but only to the extent of events or circumstances occurring after January 1, 2011, and do not invalidate existing provisions of the declaration, bylaws, plats, or plans of those condominiums.

Unit owners of units to which one hundred percent (100%) of the votes in the association are allocated, or such lesser percentage as stated in the declaration as necessary to terminate the condominium, may elect that KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

shall apply to a condominium created before the January 1, 2011. In such event the declaration, bylaws, plats, or plans of the condominium shall be modified or amended to the extent necessary to be consistent with KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary set forth in the declaration, bylaws, plats, or plans of a condominium created before January 1, 2011, the executive board of the association shall have the right to rely on the provisions set forth in KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

to deal with any situation that presents a public safety or public health issue to one (1) or more unit owners in the association.

KRS

381.805

to

381.910

shall not apply to condominiums created after January 1, 2011, and do not invalidate any amendment to the declaration, bylaws, plats, or plans of any condominium created before January 1, 2011, if the amendment would be permitted by KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

. The amendment shall be adopted in conformity with the procedures and requirements specified by those instruments and by KRS

381.805

to

381.910

. If the amendment grants to any person any rights, powers, or privileges permitted by KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

, all correlative obligations, liabilities, and restrictions in KRS 381.9101 to 381.9207 shall also apply to that person.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 2, effective January 1, 2011; 2012, ch. 99, § 1, effective April 11, 2012.

381.9105.
Definitions for KRS 381.9101 to 381.9207.

As used in KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

, or in the declaration or bylaws of any condominium unless specifically provided or the context otherwise requires:

“Affiliate of a declarant” means any person who controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with a declarant.

A person controls a declarant if the person:

Is a general partner, officer, director, limited liability entity member or manager, or employer of the declarant and has the legal authority to direct the business and affairs of the declarant;

Directly, indirectly, or acting in concert with one (1) or more other persons, or through one (1) or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing more than fifty percent (50%) of the voting interest in the declarant; or

Controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the declarant.

A person is controlled by a declarant if the declarant:

Is a general partner, officer, director, limited liability entity member or manager, or employer of the person and has the legal authority to direct the business and affairs of the person;

Directly, indirectly, or acting in concert with one (1) or more other persons, or through one (1) or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing more than fifty percent (50%) of the voting interest in the person; or

Controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the person.

Control does not exist if the powers described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection are held solely as security for an obligation and are not exercised;

“Allocated interests” means the undivided interest in the common elements, the common expense liability, and votes in the association allocated to each unit;

“Association” or “unit owners’ association” means the association organized pursuant to KRS

381.9165

;

“Capital expenditure” means an expenditure to replace, repair, or improve common elements, or acquire new common elements;

“Common elements” means all portions of a condominium other than the units;

“Common expenses” means expenditures made or financial liabilities incurred by the association, to the extent permitted by the declaration or KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

, together with any allocations to reserves;

“Common expense liability” means the liability for common expenses allocated to each unit pursuant to KRS

381.9137

;

“Condominium” means real estate, portions of which are designated for separate ownership and the remainder of which is designated for common ownership solely by the owners of those portions. Real estate is not a condominium unless the undivided interests in the common elements are vested in the unit owners;

“Declarant” means any person or group of persons acting in concert who:

As part of a common promotional plan for the condominium, formulated, sponsored, and promoted by the person or persons, offers to dispose of his, her, or their interest in a unit within the condominium not previously disposed of; or

Reserves or succeeds to any special declarant right;

“Declaration” means any instrument, including a master deed, however denominated, that creates a condominium, and any amendments to those instruments;

“Development rights” means any right or combination of rights reserved by a declarant in the declaration to:

Add real estate to a condominium;

Create units, common elements, or limited common elements within a condominium;

Subdivide units or convert units into common elements;

Allocate or reallocate common elements among units; or

Withdraw real estate from a condominium;

“Dispose” or “disposition” means a voluntary transfer to a purchaser of any legal or equitable interest in a unit, but does not include the creation, assignment, transfer, or release of a mortgage or security interest;

“Executive board” means the body, regardless of name, designated in the declaration to act on behalf of the association;

“Identifying number” means a symbol or address that identifies only one (1) unit in a condominium;

“Leasehold condominium” means a condominium in which all or a portion of the real estate is subject to a lease the expiration or termination of which will terminate the condominium or reduce its size;

“Limited common element” means a portion of the common elements allocated by the declaration or by operation of KRS

381.9127

for the exclusive use of one (1) or more but fewer than all of the units;

“Master association” means an organization described in KRS

381.9161

, whether or not it is also an association described in KRS

381.9165

;

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, limited liability company, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or other legal or commercial entity;

“Purchaser” means any person other than a declarant or a person in the business of selling real estate for his or her own account, who by means of a voluntary or involuntary transfer acquires a legal or equitable interest in a unit other than:

A leasehold interest, including renewal options of less than twenty (20) years; or

As security for an obligation;

“Real estate” means any fee simple interest, leasehold estate, or other estate or interest in, over, or under land, including structures, fixtures, and other improvements and interests which by custom, usage, or law pass with a conveyance of land though not described in the contract of sale or instrument of conveyance. “Real estate” includes parcels with or without upper or lower boundaries, and spaces that may be filled with air or water;

“Recording data” means the book and page number of instruments recorded in the office of a county clerk;

“Residential” means use for dwelling or personal recreation, or both;

“Special declarant rights” means rights reserved for the benefit of a declarant to:

Complete improvements indicated on plats and plans filed with the declaration;

Exercise any development rights;

Maintain sales offices, management offices, signs advertising the condominium, and models;

Use easements through the common elements for the purpose of making improvements within the condominium or within real estate which may be added to the condominium;

Make the condominium part of a larger condominium or a planned community;

Make the condominium subject to a master association; or

Appoint or remove any officer of the association, master association, or any executive board member during any period of declarant control;

“Unit” means a physical portion of the condominium designated for separate ownership or occupancy, the boundaries of which are described in KRS

381.9133

, including patios, balconies, and other spaces if designated in the declaration; and

“Unit owner” means a declarant or other person who owns a unit, or a lessee of a unit in a leasehold condominium whose lease expires simultaneously with any lease the expiration or termination of which will remove the unit from the condominium, but does not include a person having an interest in a unit solely as security for an obligation or as a sublessee of a lessee of a unit.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 3, effective January 1, 2011; 2012, ch. 99, § 2, effective April 11, 2012.

381.9107.
Variation by agreement.

Except as expressly provided in KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

, provisions of KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

may not be varied by agreement, and rights conferred by KRS 381.9101 to 381.9207 may not be waived. A declarant may not act under a power of attorney, or use any other device, to evade the limitations or prohibitions of KRS 381.9101 to 381.9207 or the declaration.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 4, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9109.
Separate assessments, titles, and taxation.

If there is any unit owner other than a declarant, each unit that has been created, together with its interest in the common elements, constitutes for all purposes a separate parcel of real estate.

If there is any unit owner other than a declarant, each unit shall be separately taxed and assessed, and no separate tax or assessment may be rendered against any common elements for which a declarant has reserved no development rights.

Any portion of the common elements for which the declarant has reserved any development right shall be separately taxed and assessed against the declarant, and the declarant alone is liable for payment of those taxes.

If there is no unit owner other than a declarant, the real estate comprising the condominium may be taxed and assessed in any manner provided by law.

A residential unit of a condominium may be a homestead as allowed in KRS Chapters 132 and 427.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 5, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9111.
Applicability of local ordinances, regulations, building codes, or other real estate use law.

A zoning, subdivision, building code, or other real estate use law, ordinance, or regulation shall not prohibit the condominium form of ownership or impose any requirement upon a condominium which it would not impose upon a physically identical development under a different form of ownership. Otherwise, no provision of KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

invalidates or modifies any provision of any zoning, subdivision, building code, or other real estate use law, ordinance, or regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 6, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9113.
Eminent domain.

If a unit is acquired by eminent domain, or if part of a unit is acquired by eminent domain leaving the unit owner with a remnant which may not practically or lawfully be used for any purpose permitted by the declaration, the award shall compensate the unit owner for his or her unit and its interest in the common elements, whether or not any common elements are acquired. Upon acquisition, unless the decree otherwise provides, that unit’s allocated interests are automatically reallocated to the remaining units in proportion to the respective allocated interests of those units before the taking, and the association shall promptly prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocations. Any remnant of a unit remaining after part of a unit is taken under this subsection is thereafter a common element.

Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, if part of a unit is acquired by eminent domain, the award shall compensate the unit owner for the reduction in value of the unit and its interest in the common elements, whether or not any common elements are acquired. Upon acquisition, unless the decree otherwise provides:

The unit’s allocated interests are reduced in proportion to the reduction in the size of the unit; and

The portion of the allocated interests divested from the partially acquired unit are automatically reallocated to that unit and the remaining units in proportion to the respective allocated interests of those units before the taking, with the partially acquired unit participating in the reallocation on the basis of its reduced allocated interests.

If part of the common elements is acquired by eminent domain, the portion of the award attributable to the common elements taken shall be paid to the association and, unless the declaration provides otherwise, the award attributable to the acquisition of a limited common element shall be equally divided among the owners of the units to which that limited common element was allocated at the time of acquisition.

The court decree shall be recorded in every county in which any portion of the condominium is located.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 7, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9115.
Supplemental general principles of law applicable to KRS 381.9101 to 381.9207.

Unless displaced by a particular provision of KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

, the principles of law and equity, including the law of corporations and unincorporated associations, the law of real property, and the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, eminent domain, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, receivership, substantial performance, or other validating or invalidating cause, shall supplement KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 8, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9117.
Construction against implicit repeal of KRS 381.9101 to 381.9207.

KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

being a general act intended as a unified coverage of its subject matter, no part of it shall be deemed to be impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if that construction can reasonably be avoided.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 9, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9119.
Purposes and policies of KRS 381.9101 to 381.9207 — Kentucky Condominium Act to be liberally construed.

KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

The underlying purposes and policies of KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

are:

To simplify, clarify, and modernize the law governing condominiums; and

To make uniform the law among the various jurisdictions.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 10, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9121.
Severability of invalid provision or application.

If any provision of KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of KRS 381.9101 to 381.9207 are severable.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 11, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9123.
Obligation of good faith.

Every contract or duty governed by KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

imposes an obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 12, effective January 1, 2011.